3rdParty/snowball/algorithms/romanian/stem_ISO_8859_2.sbl
routines (
           prelude postlude mark_regions
           RV R1 R2
           step_0
           standard_suffix combo_suffix
           verb_suffix
           vowel_suffix
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( pV p1 p2 )

groupings ( v )

booleans  ( standard_suffix_removed )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters */

stringdef a^   hex 'E2'  // a circumflex
stringdef i^   hex 'EE'  // i circumflex
stringdef a+   hex 'E3'  // a breve
stringdef s,   hex 'BA'  // s cedilla
stringdef t,   hex 'FE'  // t cedilla

define v 'aeiou{a^}{i^}{a+}'

define prelude as (
    repeat goto (
        v [ ('u' ] v <- 'U') or
            ('i' ] v <- 'I')
    )
)

define mark_regions as (

    $pV = limit
    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit // defaults

    do (
        ( v (non-v gopast v) or (v gopast non-v) )
        or
        ( non-v (non-v gopast v) or (v next) )
        setmark pV
    )
    do (
        gopast v gopast non-v setmark p1
        gopast v gopast non-v setmark p2
    )
)

define postlude as repeat (

    [substring] among(
        'I'  (<- 'i')
        'U'  (<- 'u')
        ''   (next)
    )

)

backwardmode (

    define RV as $pV <= cursor
    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define step_0 as (
        [substring] R1 among(
            'ul' 'ului'
                ( delete )
            'aua'
                ( <-'a' )
            'ea' 'ele' 'elor'
                ( <-'e' )
            'ii' 'iua' 'iei' 'iile' 'iilor' 'ilor'
                ( <-'i')
            'ile'
                ( not 'ab' <- 'i' )
            'atei'
                ( <- 'at' )
            'a{t,}ie' 'a{t,}ia'
                ( <- 'a{t,}i' )
        )
    )

    define combo_suffix as test (
        [substring] R1 (
            among(
            /* 'IST'. alternative: include the following
                'alism' 'alisme'
                'alist' 'alista' 'aliste' 'alisti' 'alist{a+}' 'ali{s,}ti' (
                    <- 'al'
                )
            */
                'abilitate' 'abilitati' 'abilit{a+}i' 'abilit{a+}{t,}i' (
                    <- 'abil'
                )
                'ibilitate' (
                    <- 'ibil'
                )
                'ivitate' 'ivitati' 'ivit{a+}i' 'ivit{a+}{t,}i' (
                    <- 'iv'
                )
                'icitate' 'icitati' 'icit{a+}i' 'icit{a+}{t,}i'
                'icator' 'icatori'
                'iciv' 'iciva' 'icive' 'icivi' 'iciv{a+}'
                'ical' 'icala' 'icale' 'icali' 'ical{a+}' (
                    <- 'ic'
                )
                'ativ' 'ativa' 'ative' 'ativi' 'ativ{a+}' 'a{t,}iune'
                'atoare' 'ator' 'atori'
                '{a+}toare' '{a+}tor' '{a+}tori' (
                    <- 'at'
                )
                'itiv' 'itiva' 'itive' 'itivi' 'itiv{a+}' 'i{t,}iune'
                'itoare' 'itor' 'itori' (
                    <- 'it'
                )
            )
            set standard_suffix_removed
        )
    )

    define standard_suffix as (
        unset standard_suffix_removed
        repeat combo_suffix
        [substring] R2 (
            among(

                // past participle is treated here, rather than
                // as a verb ending:
                'at' 'ata' 'at{a+}' 'ati' 'ate'
                'ut' 'uta' 'ut{a+}' 'uti' 'ute'
                'it' 'ita' 'it{a+}' 'iti' 'ite'

                'ic' 'ica' 'ice' 'ici' 'ic{a+}'
                'abil' 'abila' 'abile' 'abili' 'abil{a+}'
                'ibil' 'ibila' 'ibile' 'ibili' 'ibil{a+}'
                'oasa' 'oas{a+}' 'oase' 'os' 'osi' 'o{s,}i'
                'ant' 'anta' 'ante' 'anti' 'ant{a+}'
                'ator' 'atori'
                'itate' 'itati' 'it{a+}i' 'it{a+}{t,}i'
                'iv' 'iva' 'ive' 'ivi' 'iv{a+}' (
                    delete
                )
                'iune' 'iuni' (
                    '{t,}'] <- 't'
                )
                'ism' 'isme'
                'ist' 'ista' 'iste' 'isti' 'ist{a+}' 'i{s,}ti' (
                    <- 'ist'
                    /* 'IST'. alternative: remove with <- '' */
                )
            )
            set standard_suffix_removed
        )
    )

    define verb_suffix as setlimit tomark pV for (
        [substring] among(
            // 'long' infinitive:
            'are' 'ere' 'ire' '{a^}re'

            // gerund:
            'ind' '{a^}nd'
            'indu' '{a^}ndu'

            'eze'
            'easc{a+}'
            // present:
            'ez' 'ezi' 'eaz{a+}' 'esc' 'e{s,}ti'
            'e{s,}te'
            '{a+}sc' '{a+}{s,}ti'
            '{a+}{s,}te'

            // imperfect:
            'am' 'ai' 'au'
            'eam' 'eai' 'ea' 'ea{t,}i' 'eau'
            'iam' 'iai' 'ia' 'ia{t,}i' 'iau'

            // past: // (not 'ii')
            'ui'
            'a{s,}i' 'ar{a+}m' 'ar{a+}{t,}i' 'ar{a+}'
            'u{s,}i' 'ur{a+}m' 'ur{a+}{t,}i' 'ur{a+}'
            'i{s,}i' 'ir{a+}m' 'ir{a+}{t,}i' 'ir{a+}'
            '{a^}i' '{a^}{s,}i' '{a^}r{a+}m' '{a^}r{a+}{t,}i' '{a^}r{a+}'

            // pluferfect:
            'asem' 'ase{s,}i' 'ase' 'aser{a+}m' 'aser{a+}{t,}i' 'aser{a+}'
            'isem' 'ise{s,}i' 'ise' 'iser{a+}m' 'iser{a+}{t,}i' 'iser{a+}'
            '{a^}sem' '{a^}se{s,}i' '{a^}se' '{a^}ser{a+}m' '{a^}ser{a+}{t,}i'
            '{a^}ser{a+}'
            'usem' 'use{s,}i' 'use' 'user{a+}m' 'user{a+}{t,}i' 'user{a+}'

                ( non-v or 'u'  delete )

            // present:
            '{a+}m' 'a{t,}i'
            'em' 'e{t,}i'
            'im' 'i{t,}i'
            '{a^}m' '{a^}{t,}i'

            // past:
            'se{s,}i' 'ser{a+}m' 'ser{a+}{t,}i' 'ser{a+}'
            'sei' 'se'

            // pluperfect:
            'sesem' 'sese{s,}i' 'sese' 'seser{a+}m' 'seser{a+}{t,}i' 'seser{a+}'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define vowel_suffix as (
        [substring] RV among (
            'a' 'e' 'i' 'ie' '{a+}' ( delete )
        )
    )
)

define stem as (
    do prelude
    do mark_regions
    backwards (
        do step_0
        do standard_suffix
        do ( standard_suffix_removed or verb_suffix )
        do vowel_suffix
    )
    do postlude
)
